She wanted to say something, but he interrupted her.
'Cause I ask one thing, I ask for the right to hope, to suffer as it is now; but if it is not possible, tell me to disappear, and I will disappear.
You won't see me if my presence is hard for you.
'I don't want to drive you anywhere.
'Don't change anything.
Leave it as it is,' he said with a trembling voice. 'Here's your husband.
Indeed, at that moment he entered the living room with his calm, clumsy walk.
When he looked around his wife and his wife, he went up to the mistress and sat down for a cup of tea, and began to speak with his slow, always-hearing voice, in his usual joke tone, ripping over someone.
'Your Rambouglier is full,' he said, looking around the whole community, 'the graces and the music.
But Princess Betsy hated that tone of his, snering as she called it, and, as a smart mistress, immediately led him to a serious conversation about common military obedience.
Alexey Alexandrovich immediately became involved in the conversation and began to defend a serious new decree in front of Princess Betsy, who attacked him.
Holmes and Anna continued to sit at the small table.
'It's becoming indecent,' whispered a lady, pointing her eyes at Karenna, Wronsky and her husband.
'What did I tell you? 'Anna's friend answered.
But not only these ladies, almost all those who were in the living room, even Princess Soft and Betsy herself, have looked at them several times away from the common circle, as if it had prevented them from doing so.
Only Alexei Alexandrovich never looked that way and was not distracted from the interest of the conversation that had begun.
Noticed the distasteful impression, Princess Betsy put another face in her seat for Alexei Alexandrovich's hearing and approached Anna.
'I am always surprised at the clarity and accuracy of your husband's expressions,' she said. 'The most transcendent concepts become available to me when he speaks.
'Yes!' said Anna, smiling with a smile of happiness and understanding not a word of what Betsy said to her. She went to the big table and took part in a general conversation.
Aleksey Alexandrovich sat for half an hour, approached his wife and asked her to go home together; but she answered, without looking at him, that she would stay for dinner.
Alexei Alexandrovich bowed and went out.
An old, fat Tartarin, Karenna's dorm, in a glossy leather, barely kept a rogue, left gray standing by the door.
The footman stood by the door.
The doorman stood by holding the outside door. Anna Arkadyevna cut off the little lace of her sleeve with her quick hand from the sleeve of the coat, and she overstepped her head and listened with admiration to what she had said when she walked her out.
'You didn't say anything; let's say I don't demand anything,' he said, 'but you know that it's not friendship I need, it's perhaps one happiness in life, it's a word you don't love so much... yes, love...
'Love...' she repeated slowly, with her inner voice, and suddenly, at the same time as she unwrapped the lace, added:--I don't like that word, that it means too much to me, much more than you can understand, and she looked into his face. 'Goodbye!
She gave him her hand, and a quick, steady step passed by the doorman, and fled in the carriage,
Her eyes, the touch of her hand burned him.
He kissed his hand in the place where she touched him, and went home, happy to know that this evening he was approaching his goal in more than two months.
Alexey Alexandrovich found nothing special or indecent about his wife sitting at the special table and talking about something lively; but he noticed that others in the living room felt that it was something special and indecent, and that it therefore seemed indecent to him as well. He decided to tell his wife.
When he returned home, he went to his office, as he normally did, and sat in a chair, opening a book on papism on a knifed spot, reading until the hour, as he normally did; only occasionally did he wipe his high forehead and shake his head like he was chasing something away.
At the usual hour, he got up and made his night toilet.
Anna Arkadievna wasn't here yet.
With a book under his armpit, he came upstairs, but on this evening, instead of normal thoughts and thoughts about his work, his thoughts were filled with a wife and something unpleasant that happened to her.
He, repulsed by his habit, did not go to bed, but put his hands behind his back to walk back and forth into the rooms.
He could not lie down feeling that he needed first to reflect on a newly emerging fact.
When he decided that he needed to speak to his wife, he felt that it was very easy and simple; but now that he was thinking about this newly created circumstance, he found it very difficult and difficult.
Alexei Alexandrovich wasn't jealous.
Jealousy, he is convinced, offends his wife, and he must have confidence in his wife.
Why should he have confidence, that is, full confidence that his young wife would always love him, he did not ask himself; but he did not feel mistrust, so he had confidence and told himself that he should have him.
Now, though his belief that jealousy was a shameless feeling and that he needed to have trust had not been destroyed, he felt that he stood face-to-face in front of something illogical and stupid, and did not know what to do.
Alexey Alexandrovich stood face-to-face in front of the possibility of love in his wife for someone other than him, and it seemed to him very stupid and incomprehensible, because it was life itself.
He spent his entire life living and working in the fields of service dealing with the reflection of life. And every time he bumped into his own life, he got away from it.
Now he felt the same way that a man would feel when he passed the bridge in peace and suddenly saw that the bridge had been torn apart and that there was a puncture.
The powder was -- the life itself, the bridge -- the artificial life Alexanderovich lived.
For the first time, he had questions about his wife's ability to love someone, and he was terrified of it.
He, without undressing, walked his smooth step back and forth through the sound park of a lighted dining room, a dark living room carpet in which light reflected only the large, recently made portrait of him hanging over the couch, and through her office, where two candles were burning, covering the portraits of her family and her friends, and the beautiful, long-known trinkets of her desk.
Through her room, he reached the bedroom door and turned again.
He stopped and said to himself, "Yeah, it has to be decided and stopped, and he has to express his view of it and his decision." And he turned back.
"But to say what? What's the solution?" 'He spoke to himself in the living room, and found no answer.'
'At last,' he asked himself before turning into the office, 'what happened?
Nothing.
She talked to him for a long time.
Well?
Isn't there a woman in the light who can talk to?
And then, jealous -- it is to humiliate himself and her,' he said to himself when he entered her office; but the reasoning, which had previously borne such weight for him, now weighed nothing and meant nothing.
And he turned from the bedroom door to the room again; but as soon as he walked back into the dark living room, some voice said that it wasn't and that if others noticed it, it meant there was something.
And he said to himself again in the dining room, "Yeah, it's necessary to decide and stop and express his view..." And again in the living room before the turn, he asked himself, "What's the solution?"
And then he asked himself what happened? And he said, "Nothing, and he remembered that jealousy was a feeling that was humiliating to his wife, but once again he was convinced that something had happened in the living room.
Thought of him, like his body, made a complete circle without attacking anything new.
He noticed it, rubbed his forehead and sat in her office.
Here, looking at her table with a macahit boulevard lying upstairs and a note started, his thoughts suddenly changed.
He started thinking about her, what she thinks and feels.
For the first time, he imagined her personal life, her thoughts, her desires, and the thought that she might and should have her own special life seemed so scary that he had rushed to drive her away.
It was the chunk he was scared to look in.
Transferring thought and feeling to another creature was a mental act alien to Alexei Alexandrovich.
He considered this mental act to be harmful and dangerous fantasies.
"And most terrible of all," he thought, "that now that my case is coming to an end (he was thinking about the project he was doing now), when I need all the peace and all the strength of the soul, I now have this meaningless alarm falling on me.
But what should we do?
I'm not the kind of person who can handle anxiety and anxiety and can't face them."
'I have to think, decide, and throw it away,' he said out loud.
"The questions about her feelings, about what has been done and can be done in her soul are none of my business, it is her matter of conscience and is subject to religion", he said to himself, feeling relieved, conscious of the fact that a point of legitimacy had been found that was due to the fact that it had arisen.
"So," he said to himself, "the questions about her feelings and so on are the questions of her conscience, which I cannot care about.
My duty is clearly defined.
As head of the family, I am a person obliged to lead it, and therefore part of the face is responsible; I must point out the danger that I see, warn, and even use power.
I have to tell her."
And it became clear to Alexey Alexandrovich's mind what he would now say to his wife.
In considering what he would say, he regretted that, for domestic consumption, he had to use his time and his mental powers without being seen; yet his mind was clear and clear, as the report was, in the form and sequence of his forthcoming speech.
"I must say and say the following: first, an explanation of the meaning of public opinion and decency; second, a religious explanation of the meaning of marriage; third, if necessary, a reference to a possible misfortune for the son; fourth, a reference to her own misfortune."
And when he put his fingers behind his fingers, with his hands on the bottom, he pulled his fingers, and his fingers cracked in the joints.
This gesture, a bad habit -- the joint of hands and the cracking of fingers -- always calmed him down and led him to the care that he now needed.
At the entrance, I heard the sound of a carriage coming up. Alexei Alexandrovich stopped in the middle of the hall.
There were women's steps on the stairs.
Aleksey Alexandrovich, ready for his speech, stood by shaking his crossed fingers and waiting to see if there was anywhere else to crack.
One joint cracked.
Also, by the sound of light steps on the stairs, he felt her approach, and although he was pleased with his speech, he was afraid for the explanation to come...
Anna walked down with her head down and playing with her hands.
Her face shined brightly; but the glitter was not hilarious; it was like the terrible glitter of a fire in the dark night.
When Anna saw her husband, she raised her head and, as if she were waking up, she smiled.
'Are you out of bed?
Here's a miracle!-- she said, she threw a bastard and, without stopping, she went further to the bathroom. 'It is time, Alexis Alexandrovich,' she said because of the door.
'Anna, I need to talk to you.
'With me? 'She said, surprisedly, she came out of the door and looked at him. 'What is this?
What's that about? 'She asked, sitting down.' 'Well, let's talk if we have to.'
I'd rather sleep.
Anna said that she had come into her tongue, and she was surprised, listening to herself, to her ability to lie.
How simple, natural her words were, and how it seemed that she just wanted to sleep!
She felt dressed in an impenetrable armor of lies. She felt that some invisible force had helped her and supported her.
'Anna, I must warn you,' he said.
'Will you warn me?' 'She said.' 'In what?
She looked so easy, so funny, that someone who didn't know her, as her husband knew, couldn't see anything unnatural in the sound or in the sense of her words.
But for him, who knew her, who knew that when he went to bed drinking minutes later, she noticed and asked for a reason, for him, who knew that all her joy, joy, grief, she told him immediately, now that she didn't want to notice his condition, which she didn't want to say about herself, meant much.
He saw that the depth of her soul, always opened before him, was hidden from him.
Not only did he see in her tone that she wasn't embarrassed by it, but she would say to him, "Yes, it's closed, and that's how it's gonna be, and it's gonna be.
Now he felt the same way that a man would experience when he returned home and found his house locked up.
"But maybe there's still a key," thought Alexei Alexandrovich.
'I want to warn you of this,' he said in a quiet voice, 'that by negligence and rashness you can give a reason to talk about you.
Your very lively conversation today with Count Wronsky (he spoke this name with calm and firmness) has come to his attention.
He spoke and looked at her laughing, scary now to him with his impenetrable eyes, and he felt all the useless and idleness of his words.
'You've always been like this,' she answered, as if she didn't understand him at all and out of everything he had deliberately understood only the latter. 'You hate that I'm bored, you hate that I'm fun.
I wasn't bored.
Does that insult you?
Alexei Alexandrovich shuddered and shuddered his hands to crack them.
'Oh, please don't talk, I don't like it so much,' she said.
'Anna, is that you? 'Alexei Alexandrovich said quietly, making an effort against himself, and restraining the movement of his hands.'
'What is it?' she said with such sincere and comic surprise. 'What do you want from me?
Alexei Alexandrovich silenced and rubbed his forehead and eyes with his hand.
He saw that instead of what he wanted to do, i.e. to warn his wife of a mistake in the eyes of the world, he was anxious about what had touched her conscience, and he fought against his imaginary wall.
'I intend to say this,' he continued cold and calm, 'and I ask you to listen to me.
I admit, as you know, jealousy is offensive and humiliating, and I will never allow myself to be guided by that feeling; but there are well-known laws of decency that cannot be transgressed with impunity.
Now I didn't notice, but judging by the impression that was made on society, everyone noticed that you didn't behave and keep yourself exactly what you wanted.
'I don't really understand anything,' said Anna, shaking her shoulders.
"He doesn't care," she thought. 'But they have noticed in society, and it troubles him.' 'You are not well, Alexis Alexandrovich,' she added, stood up, and wanted to walk out the door; but he moved forward as if he wanted to stop her.
His face was ugly and dark as Anna had never seen him.
She stopped and turned her head back, side by side, and started picking her stilts with her quick hand.
'Well, I'm listening to what's going to happen,' she said calmly and ridiculously. 'And even listens with interest, because I would like to know what's going on.
She spoke and was surprised at the natural-satisfied, faithful tone she had spoken and the choice of the words she had used.
'I have no right to enter into all the details of your feelings, and I consider it to be useless and even harmful at all,' Alexis Alexandrovich began. 'As we dig in our souls, we often dig up things that would lie hidden.
Your feelings are a matter of your conscience; but I owe it to you, to myself, and to God, to show you your responsibilities.
Our lives are bound, not by men, but by God.
Only a crime can break that connection, and a crime of this kind carries a heavy penalty.
'I don't understand.
Oh, my God, I'm so sleepy! 'She said, scrubbing her hair quickly and searching for the remaining stilts.
'Anna, for God's sake, don't say that,' he said mildly. 'Maybe I'm wrong, but believe me, what I'm saying, I speak as much for myself as I speak for you.
I'm your husband and I love you.
For a moment, her face fell down, and there was a laughing spark in her eyes; but the word "love" repulsed her.
She thought, "Love? How can he love?
If he hadn't heard of love, he would never have used that word.
He doesn't know what love is."
'Alexei Alexandrovich, right, I don't understand,' she said. 'Define what you find...'
'Let me, let me finish.'
I love you.
But I'm not talking about myself; the main faces here are our son and you.
It may well be, I repeat, that my words seem in vain and inappropriate to you; perhaps they are caused by my error.
In that case, I'm asking you to excuse me.
But if you feel that there's any reason, I'm asking you to think, and if your heart tells you, to tell me...
Alexei Alexandrovich, though not aware of it, did not say what he had prepared.
'I have nothing to say.
And... all of a sudden, she quickly said, having difficulty holding a smile, 'right, it's time to go to sleep.
Alexey Alexandrovich sighed and, without saying anything else, went to the bedroom.
When she entered the bedroom, he was already lying there.
His lips were tight, and his eyes weren't looking at her.
Anna went to her bed and waited every minute for him to talk to her again.
She was afraid he was gonna talk, and she wanted to.
But he didn't say anything.
She's been waiting a long time and she's forgotten about him.
She thought of another, she saw him and felt her heart filled with excitement and criminal joy.
Suddenly she heard a smooth and calm nose whistle.
In the first minute, it was as if he was afraid of his whistle and stopped; but after waiting for two breaths, the whistle spread out with a new, calm order.
'It is too late, too late,' she whispered with a smile.
She lay still for a long time with her eyes open, whose glitter she thought she saw herself in the dark.
From this evening, a new life began for Alexei Alexandrovich and his wife.
Nothing really happened.
Anna, as always, traveled to the world, especially visiting Princess Betsy, and meeting with Wronski everywhere.
Alexei Alexandrovich saw it, but there was nothing he could do.
For all his efforts to get her to explain, she countered him with an impenetrable wall of some kind of hilarious perplexation.
It was the same outside, but their internal relations have changed completely.
Alexey Alexandrovich, such a strong man in public service, felt powerless, like an ox, bowing his head down, waiting for a veil that he felt had been lifted over him.
Every time he started thinking about it, he felt he had to try again, that kindness, tenderness, conviction still had hope of saving her, making her remember, and he was going to talk to her every day.
But every time he started talking to her, he felt that the spirit of evil and deception that possessed her had taken possession of him, and he spoke to her in a very different and different way. He spoke to her involuntarily with his usual tone of joking at someone who would say that.
And in that tone, you couldn't say what you had to say to her. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know.
For almost a year, what constituted the only wish of his life, replacing all his previous desires; what was the impossible, terrible, and all the more fascinating, dream of happiness for Anna was satisfied.
Pale, with a shivering lower jaw, he stood above her and begged for calm, not knowing what or what.
'Anna! Anna!--he said with a trembling voice. 'Anna, for God's sake! '
But the louder he spoke, the lower she lowered her once proud, merry, now her shameful head, and she was all bent and fell from the couch on which she sat on the floor to his feet; she would fall on the carpet if he hadn't held her.
'Oh, my God!
Forgive me!-- sniffing, she said, holding his hands to her chest.
She felt so guilty and guilty that all she had to do was humiliate herself and ask forgiveness. Now in life she had no one but him, so she prayed to him for forgiveness.
She looked at him and felt physically humiliated and couldn't say anything else.
He felt what the killer should feel when he saw a body deprived of its life.
This body that deprived them of their lives was their love, the first period of their love.
There was something awful and disgusting about the memory of what was being paid at the terrible cost of shame.
Embarrassed in the face of his spiritual nakedness, he pressured her and reported to him.
But despite the horror of the killer in front of the victim's body, you have to cut to pieces, hide this body, you have to use what the killer bought with the murder.
And with anger, as if with passion, the murderer threw himself at that body, and dragged it, and cut it: even so he covered her face and shoulders with kisses.
She held his hand and didn't move.
Yes, these kisses are what this shame buys.
Yes, and this one hand, which will always be mine, is the hand of my accomplice.
She raised that hand and kissed her.
He went down to his knees and wanted to see her face; but she hid him and said nothing.
Finally, as if she had made an effort to herself, she rose up and pushed him away.
Her face was still so beautiful, but it was all the more pathetic.
'It's over,' she said. 'I have nothing but you.
Remember that.
'I can't help but remember what my life is.
In a minute of this happiness...
'What a joy!' she said with disgust and horror, and the horror willingly conveyed to him. 'For God's sake, not a word, not another word.'
She quickly stood up and walked away from him. 'Never more,' she repeated, and with a strange expression of cold despair on his face, she broke up with him.
She felt that at that moment she could not express that sense of shame, joy, and horror before entering a new life, and she did not want to talk about it, to put it in inaccurate words.
But both after and on the third day, not only did she not find words that she could express the complexity of these feelings, but she did not find thoughts that she could think with herself about what was in her soul.
She said to herself, "No, now I can't think about it; after I'm calmer."
But this calm never came to mind; every time she thought of what she had done, what she would do, what she would do, what she would do, she was terrified, and she turned her mind away.
'After, after,' she said, 'when I am calmer.
But in her dream, when she had no power over her thoughts, her situation seemed to her in all her ugly nudity.
One dream visited her almost every night.
She dreamed that both of her husbands were together, that both were wasting their caress.
Alexey Alexandrovich wept, kissing her hands, and said, "How good it is now! And Alexey Wronsky was right there, and he was also her husband.
And when she was surprised that it had previously seemed impossible to do so, she explained to them, laughing that it was much easier and that they were both happy and happy.
But this dream, like a nightmare, put pressure on her, and she woke up horribly.
As early as his return from Moscow, when Levin each time freaked out and blushed, remembering the shame of his refusal, he said to himself, "I also blushed and pissed, thinking all of them dead when I got one per physicist and stayed in second year; he also thought he was dead after ruining my sister's case.
So what?
Now that the years have passed, I remember and wonder how sad it could have been for me.
The same will happen with this grief.
The time will pass, and I will be indifferent to it."
But three months later, he wasn't indifferent to it, and just like he was in the early days, he was hurt to think about it.
He couldn't calm down because he, who had long dreamed of a family life, felt so ripe for her, wasn't married and was far away from being married.
He felt painfully on his own, as all around him felt, that it was not good in his year for a man to be one.
He remembered before he left for Moscow telling his cattleman Nikolai, the naive man he liked to talk to, "What, Nikolai! I want to get married," and as Nikolai answered in haste, as a case in which there can be no doubt, "It's about time, Constantin Dmitrich."
But getting married now is worse from him than ever.
The place was occupied, and when he was now imagining putting someone he knew in that place, he felt that it was completely impossible.
Moreover, the memory of rejection and the role he played in it was a source of shame to him.
As much as he said to himself that he had nothing to do with it, the memory, like other such embarrassing memories, forced him to freak out and blush.
There were in his past, like every man, bad deeds for which his conscience should have tormented him; but the remembrance of evil deeds did not torment him as much as these vile but shameful memories.
These wounds have never been sustained.
And along with those memories, there was now a refusal and the pathetic situation in which he was to be presented to others this evening.
But time and work did their job.
He had more and more painful memories of invisible but significant events in village life.
Every week, he kept thinking less and less about Kitty.
He was looking forward to hearing that she had already come out or was getting married the other day, hoping that the news would cure him.
In the meantime, spring, beautiful, friendly, unwaited spring, is one of the rare springs where plants, animals, and humans rejoice together.
This beautiful spring has further inspired Levin and confirmed his intention to renounce all things in order to have a firm and independent life of his own.
Although many of the plans with which he had returned to the village had not been fulfilled, most importantly, he respected the purity of life. He did not feel the shame that usually tormented him after the fall, and he had the courage to look people in the eye.
As early as February, he received a letter from Maria Nikolaevna saying that Brother Nikolai's health was getting worse, but that he did not want to be treated, and as a result Levin went to Moscow to see his brother and talked him into consulting a doctor and going to the waters abroad.
He managed so well to persuade his brother and lend him money to travel, without annoying him that he was pleased with himself in that regard.
In addition to the farm that required special attention in spring, Levin began this writing in winter on the farm, the plan of which was that the nature of the farm would be taken as absolute as climate and soil, and therefore that all the provisions of the farm science would be derived not from the soil and climate alone, but from the soil, the climate and the known constant nature of the worker.
So, despite being isolated or isolated, his life was extremely full, and only occasionally did he feel an unsatisfied desire to communicate his thoughts to anyone other than Agatha Mikhaylovna, even though he often talked about physics, economic theory, and particularly philosophy; philosophy was the favorite subject of Agatha Mikhaylovna.
Spring hasn't been open for a long time.
The last weeks of the post have been clear, cold weather.
In the day it melted in the sun, and in the night it reached seven degrees; and the fast was as though they were riding without a road. Easter was in the snow.
Then suddenly, on the second day of the Holy, a warm wind came, the clouds were moved, and three days and three nights rained a stormy and warm rain.
On Thursday, the wind was quiet, and the thick gray fog was moved, as if hiding the secrets of the changes that had occurred in nature.
In the fog, the waters poured out, the ice blazed and moved, the murky, inflammable streams moved faster, and the Red Gorca, since the evening, the fog burst, the clouds split with pins, became clear, and the real spring opened.
In the morning, the bright sun quickly ate a thin ice that ripped the water, and all the warm air trembled with the evaporating of the dead earth.
The old and needle - breaking young grass became green, the kidneys of the kale, the seared and sticky liquor birch were inflated, and the overflying bee was encircled in the golden light of the vine.
There were invisible burrows above the velvet of the greens and the icy stew, crying over the storm's indignant waters and marshes, and flying high with the spring frogs of the crane and geese.
Crying on the bounces, only where the cattle had not yet passed over, playing crooked lambs around losing a wave of bleaching mothers, running the fast-legged guys through the sniffing, with the footprints of the bare feet of the trails, slamming on the pond the fun voices of the women with the canvass, and slamming through the backyards the axes of the men who set up the hawks and borons.
It's real spring.
Levin put on large boots for the first time, not a coat, but a soup pin, and went on the household, walking through the streams, cutting their eyes with their glitter in the sun, walking on the ice, in sticky mud.
Spring is a time of plans and assumptions. And when Levin came out into the yard, as a tree in spring, who did not yet know where and how his young runners and branches in his kidneys would grow, he himself did not know very well which businesses in his favourite household he would now accept, but felt that he was full of plans and suggestions of the best.
First of all, he went to the bastard.
The cows were released to the bowl and, shining over the smooth wool, warmed up in the sun, mooing and wailing in the field.
After seeing the cows in the slightest detail, Levin ordered them to be thrown out into the field, and let the calves out.
The shepherd had fun getting ready in the field.
Stomp women, picking up pores, barefoot, still white, unburned feet, slapped in the mud, running with the darlings after the mooing, stunning the calves in the spring, putting them in the yard.
After admiring this year &apos; s hives, which were incredibly good, the early calves were with a man &apos; s cow, Pavin &apos; s daughter, three months old, with an annual height, Levin ordered them to bring the bark out and put the hay behind bars.
But it turns out that in the unused winter bark, the groceries made since the fall were broken.
He sent for a carpenter who was supposed to work along with a hammer. But it turns out that the carpenter was fixing the borons that were supposed to be fixed from the oil.
It was very annoying for Levin.
It was a shame that this grudge of the economy, against which he fought with all his strength for so many years, was repeated.
The bars, as he learned, which were not necessary in winter, were moved to the work stables and were broken because they were made easily for veals.
It also found that the borons and all the agricultural tools that had been ordered to be inspected and repaired in winter and for which three carpenters had been deliberately taken had not been repaired, and the borons had nevertheless been repaired when they had to go fast.
Levin sent for the commander, but immediately he went to look for him himself.
The orderman, as shining as he did all day, in a moronic slut walking from the gumna, breaking a straw in his hands.
'Why isn't a carpenter on a hammer?
'Yes, I wanted to report yesterday: The borons must be repaired.'
I mean, there's the smell.
'What's the matter with you in winter?'
'Would you like anything about a carpenter?'
'Where are the bars from the vealyard?'
'Did he order you to take it down to the ground?'
What do you command with this people? 'The orderman said, waving his hand.'
'Not with this people, but with this orderman!' said Levin, in a flash. 'Why do I keep you?' 'He screamed.'
But when you remembered that you wouldn't help, you stopped at half the speech and just sighed. 'Are we allowed to sow?' 'He asked, silently.'
'Turkin tomorrow, or the day after tomorrow, will be possible.
'And the clover?'
'I sent Vasilia with Miska, scattered.
I don't know if they're gonna make it.
'How many tithes?'
'Six.
'Why not all of them?' 'Screamed Levin.'
That the clover was only six, not twenty ten, it was even more annoying.
By planting clover, and by theory and by his own experience, it was only good when it was done as early as possible, almost in the snow. Levin could never have done so.
'No people.
What are you going to do with this people?
Three didn't come.
There's Semen...
'Well, you'd give up the straw.
'Yes, I did.'
'Where are the people?
'Five comots make (this meant compost) Four owes are overspilled; however touched, Konstantin Dmitrich.
Levin knew very well that "no matter how touched" meant that the seed of the English oatmeal had already been damaged," again did not do what he had ordered.
'Cause I've said it in fasting, pipes!' 'He cried out.'
'Don't worry, we'll do it in time.
Levin pissed his hand off, went to the barn to look at the oats, and went back to the stables.
The oves aren't spoiled yet. But the workers splintered it with shovels, while it was possible to put it right into the lower barn, and by ordering it, and by tearing off two workers from here to plant a clover, Levin calmed down from his displeasure.
And the day was so good, you couldn't be angry.
'Ignat!' he cried out to the man with his sleeves on the well, who was washing his wheelchair. 'Sediment me...'
'Whose order is it?'
'Well, at least Kolpica.'
While the horse was riding, Levin again called the man in plain sight to make peace with him, and began to tell him about the coming spring works and economic plans.
The dung ride starts early so it's all over before the early shovel. And plows in and out of the deep field to keep him on the black ferry.
You don't want to get rid of the shit. It's the workers.
The orderer listened carefully and apparently made an effort to approve the master's suggestions; but he did have such a familiar face for Levin and always annoyed with his hopeless and disheartening appearance.
The view said, "It's all good, God willing."
Nothing upset Levin as much as that tone. But that's the tone of every order he's ever had.
Everyone had the same attitude to his assumptions, so he was no longer angry anymore, but he was upset and felt even more excited to fight it with some kind of natural force, which he could not otherwise call "what God will" and which was constantly opposed to him.
'When we get there, Konstantin Dmitrich,' said the commander.
'Why can't you make it?'
'The workers must certainly be hired by fifteen more.
They don't come. They've been asking for 70 rubles for the summer.
Levin shut up.
Once again, that power was opposed.
He knew that, as many as they tried, they could not hire more than forty, thirty-seven, thirty-eight workers for the real price; forty were hired, and no more.
But he couldn't help but fight.
'Let's go to Sura, to Chef if they don't come.'
We've got to find it.
'I will send it,' said Vasily Fedorovitch. 'Well, the horses are weak.'
'We will.
'Cause I know,' he added by laughing, 'you're all smaller and worse; but I'm not gonna let you do it in your own way this year.
I'll do it myself.
'You don't seem to sleep very much.
We're having more fun, like the owner in front of us...
'Are the clover scattered behind Berezov Dol?'
I'm gonna take a look, he said, sitting on a little bald Cole set up by a doll.
'You will not pass through the creek, Konstantin Dmitrich,' screamed the pitcher.
'Well, so in the forest.'
And Levin went in the mud of the yard behind the gate and into the field, by the way of a good, stable horse snoring over the puddles and asking for guidance.
If Levin was having fun in cattle and greasy courtyards, he was even more happy in the field.
As he shuddered on the other side of a good horse, drinking a warm, fresh smell of snow and air while passing through the woods through some of the remaining dusty, sunken snow with sparkling traces, he rejoiced at each of his trees with his moss alive on the bark and his kidneys swollen.
When he set out for the woods, he was faced with a flat velvet rug of green, with no flask and no drape, but somewhere in the valleys, stained with the remains of melting snow.
He was not angry with the appearance of the peasant horse and the strigun, who trampled its green (he told him to drive them over to the man he met), nor with the mocking and foolish answer of the man Ipat, whom he met, and asked: "What, Ipat, shall we sow soon?" 'We must plow first, Constantin Dmitrich,' answered Ipat.
The further he drove, the more fun he was getting, and one was better than the other: lay all the fields with vines on the midday lines, so that the snow would not fall beneath them; cut into six fields of slurry and three spares with herbs; build a livestock yard at the far end of the field and dig a pond; and set up portable pastures for livestock to fertilisers.
And then three hundred tens of wheat, one hundred potatoes, one hundred fifty clovers, and not a single depleted tithe.
With such dreams, carefully turning the horse between the two, to avoid stomping his greens, he drove up to the workers who scattered the clover.
The seed cart was not at the end, but at the field, and the wheat winter was dug up with wheels and fossils by a horse.
Both employees were sitting in the middle, probably picking up a common tube.
The land in the cart, with which the seeds were mixed, was not crushed, but was followed, or fouled, by the comels.
When he saw the owner, Vasily the worker went to the cart, and Mishka began to crucify.
It wasn't good, but Levin was rarely angry with the workers.
When Vasily approached, Levin told him to send a horse to the border.
'Nothing, sir, will delay,' replied Vasily.
'Please don't talk,' said Levin, 'but do as they say.'
'I'm listening,' answered Vasily and took the horse's head. 'And now, Konstantin Dmitrich,' he said, looking for, 'the first class.
Just walk the passion!
You're on the poodle.
'Why do you have unsoiled land?' 'Said Levin.'
'Yes, we do,' replied Vasily, picking up seeds and rubbing the ground in the palms.
It wasn't Vasily's fault that he was filled with unsold land, but it was annoying.
Many times after using the means known to him to silence his anger and everything that seems to be bad to do good again, Levin used it now.
He watched Mishka walk, grumbling a giant coma of land on each leg, cry off a horse, took a dumpling from Vasily, and went to tear it apart.
'Where are you staying?
Vasily pointed to the mark with his foot, and Levin went as well as he could to sow the earth with seeds.
It was hard to walk as in the marsh, and Levin, after passing through the lech, sweated and stopped, gave up the shovel.
'Well, my lord, for the summer I shouldn't be scolding for that lech,' said Vasily.
'Why? 'Funly said Levin, feeling the reality of the means already used.'
'Look at the summer.
It's gonna be great.
Look where I sat last spring. What a mess!
'Cause I, Konstantin Dmitrich, I think that's how my father's doing it.
I don't like doing bad things myself, and I don't tell anyone else.
The owner's good, and we're good.
'As you look out,' said Vasily, pointing to the field, 'the heart rejoices.
'And good spring, Vasily.
'It's so spring, the old men won't remember.
I was at home, and there's an old man who planted three osminists, too.
That's what he says. You can't tell from the rust.
'How long have you been planting wheat?'
'You have taught me a year's work; you have sacrificed two things to me.
A quarter has been sold, and three osminists have been planted.
'Well, look, grow a coma,' said Levin, approaching the horse, 'look after Bear. And it's gonna be a good one, you're 50 grand a tithe.
'Thank you very much.
We seem to be so pleased with you.
Levin sat on a horse, and went to the field where last year's clover was, and to that which the plow was prepared under the golden wheat.
The clover's stewing was wonderful.
He's out of the woods and he's green because of last year's wheat stalks.
The horse was chained to the hub, and each leg of her smacked out of the half-dreading land.
In the ploughing pond, it was not possible to pass: it was there that it held the ice, and in the sweating plows the foot was chained above the hub.
The smell was excellent; in two days it will be possible to boron and sow.
Everything was fine, everything was fun.
Levin went back through the stream, hoping that the water had come out. And indeed, he moved in and spooked two ducks.
"There must be some valdshneps," he thought, and just at the turn of the house, he met a forest guard who confirmed his theory of valdshneps.
Levin went home to eat lunch and prepare his gun for the evening.
When Levin came home in the most fun mood, he heard a bell from the main entrance to the house.
"Yeah, it's from the railway," he thought. "It's time for the Moscow train...
Who would that be?
What if it's Nikolai's brother?
He said, "Perhaps I will go to the water, or maybe I will come to you." He was afraid and uncomfortable at the first moment that the presence of Brother Nikolai would upset his happy spring setting.
But he was ashamed of that feeling, and at once, as if he had opened his inner arms, he looked forward to it, and now he wanted it to be a brother.
He touched the horse, and when he went out for the acacia, he saw an Oma three coming from a train station and a gentleman in a coat.
It wasn't a brother.
"Oh, if someone was a nice person to talk to," he thought.
'Ah!' cried Levin with joy, raising both hands to the top. 'Here's a happy guest!
Oh, I'm so glad to see you!-- he screamed when he recognized Stepan Arkadyich.
"I'll find out if I'm out or when I'm getting married," he thought.
And on this beautiful spring day, he felt that remembering her didn't hurt him at all.
'What, didn't wait?' said Stepan Arkadić, climbing out of his sleigh, with a lump of dirt on his nose, on his cheek, and on his eyebrow, but radiant with joy and health. 'He has come to see you, once,' he said, hugging him and kissing him, 'on the urge to stand, two, and the forest in Jergushov to sell three.
'Great! What's spring like?
How did you get on the sleigh?
'The cart is even worse, Konstantin Dmitrich,' answered a friend of the dungeon.
'Well, I am very, very pleased with you,' said Levin, smiling honestly with a childish smile.
Levin had his guest in the guest room, where Stepan Arkadjić's belongings had been brought: a bag, a gun in the case, a cigar bag, and leaving him to wash and change, while he had gone to the office to speak about the pillow and the clover.
Agatha Mikhaylovna, who is always very concerned about the honor of the house, met him in front questions about lunch.
'Whatever you want to do, but quickly,' he said, and went to the commander.
When he returned, Stepan Arkadić, washed, brushed, and smiled, came out of his door, and they went upstairs together.
'Well, I'm so glad I got to you!
Now I understand what the mystery you're doing here is.
But no, right, I envy you.
What a house, how lovely it is! Light, fun,' said Stepan Arkadych, forgetting that spring and clear days are not always like today. 'And your nanny is so adorable!
A pretty maid in an apron would be more desirable; but with your monasticity and strict style, that's very good.
Stepan Arkadić gave a lot of interesting news and especially interesting news for Levin that his brother, Sergei Ivanovic, was going to visit him in the village this summer.
Stepan Arkadić did not say a single word about Kitty and Scherbatsky at all; he only gave his wife a bow.
Levin was grateful for his sensitivity and was very pleased with the guest.
As always, during his solitude, he had a gap of thoughts and feelings that he could not convey to others, and now he poured into Stepan Arkadyić and the poetic joy of spring, and failures and plans of the household, and thoughts and comments about the books he had read, and in particular the idea of his essay, which, although he himself did not notice, was based on criticism of all the old works of the farm.
Stepan Arkadić, always sweet, understanding all the hints, was especially nice in this visit, and Levin noticed a new one that flattered him with respect and as if tenderness to himself.
The effort of Agatha Mikhaylovna and the cook to make the meal particularly good only had the effect that both hungry pals would eat bread with butter, a towel, and salt mushrooms, and that Levin would serve soup without the cakes that the chef wanted especially to surprise the guest.
But Stepan Arkadić, though accustomed to other meals, found everything excellent, both herbal, and bread, and oil, and especially the shelves, and fungus, and the raisins, and the chicken under the white sauce, and the white Crimean wine -- everything was wonderful and wonderful.
'Great, great,' he said, stabbing a fat papyros after a hot one. 'I'm definitely coming out of the boat after the noise, and I'm shaking on a quiet shore.'
So you're saying that the very element of a worker should be studied and directed in the choice of household practices.
I'm a freak, but I think the theory and the application will have an impact on the worker.
'Yes, but wait: I'm not talking about political economy, I'm talking about economic science.
It must be like natural sciences and observe these phenomena and workers with its economic, ethnographic...
At that time, Agatha Mikhaylovna entered with jam.
'Well, Agatha Mikhaylovna,' said Stepan Arkadić to her, kissing the tips of her swollen fingers, 'what a layer you have, what a herb!'
Isn't it time, Kostya? 'He added.'
Levin looked out the window at the sun coming down after the bare poppy of the forest.
'It is time, it is time,' he said. 'Kuzma, set up the ruler!' and ran down.
Stepan Arkadić went down, carefully removed the sailor's drawer from the polished drawer and opened it and collected his expensive, new weapon.
Kuzma, who had already sensed a large vodka day, did not depart from Stepan Arkadyić and put on stockings and boots, which Stepan Arkadić willingly gave him to do.
'Of course, Kostya, if Ryabinin the merchant comes -- I told him to come today -- to receive and wait...'
'Are you selling the woods?'
'Yes, do you know him?
'Oh, I know.
I've been dealing with him "positively and definitively."
'Stepan Arkadić laughed.
"The final and positive" was a favorite word of the merchant.
'Yes, he is an amazingly funny man.
I knew where the master was going. He added his hand to Laska, who was squeezing at Levin and licking his hand, his boots, and his gun.
The debt was standing by the porch when they got out.
'I have ordered the mortgage, though it is not far; shall we walk?'
'No, we better go,' said Stepan Arkadić, approaching the debt.
He sat down, turned his legs around with a tiger blanket and smoked a cigar. 'Oh, you don't smoke!
Shigara is not a pleasure, but a crown and a sign of pleasure.
What a life!
That's so good!
I wish I could live!
'Who's stopping you? 'Smile,' said Levin.
'No, you're a lucky man.
Everything you love, you have.
You love horses -- eat, dogs -- eat, hunt -- eat, farm -- eat.
'Maybe because I'm happy with what I have, and I don't want what I don't have,' said Levin, remembering Kitty.
Stepan Arkadych understood, looked at him, but he didn't say anything.
Levin was grateful to Oblonski for his constant tact, when he noticed that Levin was afraid to talk about the Shcherbatskys, he said nothing about them; but now Levin wanted to know what was so tormenting him, but he did not dare speak.
'So, how are you doing?' 'Said Levin, thinking about how bad it is for him to think only of himself.'
Stepan Arkadyich's eyes are hilarious.
'You don't admit to being able to love a cocktail when you have a napkin,' you think it's a crime; and I don't recognize a life without love,' he said, understanding Levin's question in his own way. 'What to do, I am so created.'
And right, so little does this to anyone, and so much pleasure to yourself...
'Well, is there anything new?' 'I asked Levin.'
'Yes, brother!
You see, you know, the kind of women Ossian... women you see in a dream...
These women are real... and these women are terrible.
A woman, you see, it's such a subject that no matter how much you study it, it's gonna be completely new.
'It is better not to study.'
'No, I'm not.
Some mathematician said it wasn't about finding the truth, but about looking for it.
Levin listened silently, and despite all the efforts he had made, he could not bear the soul of his friend and could not understand his feelings and the beauty of studying such women.
The thrust was close to the river in the small orange.
When Levin came up to the woods, he cried, and led Oblonsky to the corner of a wrinkled and stubble Pole that had already been freed from the snow.
He himself returned to the other side of the berez twin and, by sticking the gun to the development of the dry lower bitch, took off the kaftan, relaxed and tried the freedom of movement of his hands.
The old, gray Laska, who followed them, sat carefully against him and alerted his ears.
The sun went down to the large forest; and in the light of dawn, the berets spread out in the blueberries were clearly painted with their hanging branches, with swollen branches, ready to burst their kidneys.
From the forest, where there was still snow, the water flowed a little bit further with shaky narrow streams of water.
The little birds roamed and occasionally flew from tree to tree.
In the interim of perfect silence, the sound of last year's leaves was heard, moving from the melting of the earth and from the growth of herbs.
"How it feels!
You can hear and see the grass growing!" 'Says Levin to himself, seeing a grift-colored wet leaf under the needle of a young herb.
He stood, listened, and looked down, and upon the wet, wrinkled earth, and upon the listening Laska, and upon the sea of bare tops of the forest that was under the mountain, and upon the cloud that was curled with white stripes, the clouded sky.
The hawk, flying its wings in haste, flew high above the distant forest; the other one also flew in the same direction and fled.
Birds were getting louder and more troublesome.
Sniffed the philine nearby, and Laska groaned over a few steps carefully and turned her head aside and listened.
The river made me hear a cuckoo.
She started screaming twice, and then she snore, hurry and get confused.
'How it feels! 'Cuckle!' said Stepan Arkadych, leaving behind the bush.
'Yes, I hear,' said Levin, with displeasure, breaking the silence of the forest with his unpleasant voice. 'Now soon.
Stepan Arkadjić's figure came back to the bush, and Levin saw only a bright match light, which followed the red coal of the papyros and the blue smoke.
Chick! Hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey, hey! 'Clicked the triggers of Stepan Arkadyich. &apos;
'What's that screaming? 'Oblonsky asked, drawing Levin's attention to a long gourd, as if it were a thin voice, a slag, a groaning of a stallion.'
'Oh, you don't know?
It's a male hare.
Let him speak!
Look, it's coming! 'Then he almost cried Levin, raising the triggers.'
I heard a long, thin whistle, and, just in that usual tactic, so familiar to the hunter, two seconds later -- another, third, and after the third whistle, the ferret was already heard.
Levin turned his eyes to the right, to the left, and behold, a flying bird appeared in front of him in the dark blue sky.
It flew straight into it: the close sounds of the ferrets, which were like the uniform overlaying of the tight tissue, were scattered over the very ear; the long nose and neck of the birds were already seen, and at the moment Levin was attached, because of the bush where the Oblonian was standing, the red lightning shone; the bird, like an arrow, came down and swam again. Once again the lightning shone, and the sound of the blow was heard; and the bird, as if to keep its wings in the air, stopped, stood for a moment, and smacked hard on the ground.
'Is it a miss?' 'Stepan Arkadić screamed, who could not see because of the smoke.'
'Here he is! 'Said Levin, pointing to Laska, who, by lifting one ear and flying high with the tip of a fluffy tail, took a quiet step, as if to prolong the pleasure and as if smiling, brought the dead bird to the master.' 'Well, I am glad that you succeeded,' said Levin, yet already jealous that he had not succeeded in killing this valdshnep.
'Bad slip from the right barrel,' answered Stepan Arkadić, charging the gun. 'Sh... it's coming.
Indeed, they heard piercing, fast-tracking whistles.
Two valdsnaps, playing and catching up with each other, and only whistles, not eyesights, hit the very heads of hunters.
Four shots were fired, and, like the sleeves, the valds gave a quick turn and disappeared. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know. I don't know.
The load was beautiful.
Stepan Arkadič killed two more grand and Levin two, of which one was missing.
It's getting dark.
The clear silver Venus is low in the west, already glowing because of the birch with its tender glitter, and high in the east has already spilled its red lights into the dark Arctic.
Levin caught and lost the stars of the Bear over his head.
The Waldshneps had already stopped flying; but Levin decided to wait until the bitch below Venus's birch passed above him, and when the stars of the Bear would be clear everywhere.
Venus has gone above the bitch, the bear's chariot with its breath was already visible in the dark blue sky, but he was still waiting.
'It is time, isn't it?' 'Stepan Arkadić said.'
It was already quiet in the woods, and no bird moved.
'Stay still,' answered Levin.
'As you wish.
They stood now 15 feet apart.
'Steve! 'Suddenly Levin said,' why don't you tell me if your sister-in-law got married or when?
Levin felt so firm and calm that no answer, he thought, could worry him. But he wasn't expecting what Stepan Arkadych said.
'And I didn't think or think of getting married, and she is very sick, and the doctors sent her abroad.
Even afraid for her life.
'Oh, come on! 'Screamed Levin.' 'A very sick woman?
What's wrong with her?
How did she...
While they were saying it, Laska looked up into the sky, and looked down on them.
"Here's the time to talk," she thought. 'And he is flying...'
That's it, that's it.
'They're pronouncing..." thought Laska.
But at that very moment, both of them suddenly heard a piercing whistling whistle, which was as if he had stabbed them in the ear, and both of them suddenly grabbed the guns, and two lightnings shone, and two blows went out in the same moment.
The high-flying valdshnep immediately folded its wings and fell into the bowl, bending thin escapes.
'That's great!
General!--Screamed Levin and ran with Laska to find the valdshnep.
"Oh, yeah, what was that awful about? 'He remembered.' 'Yes, Kitty is sick...'
Well, that's too bad," he thought.
'Ah, I found it! He said, "This is a smart girl," he said, taking out Lasky's mouth with a warm bird and putting it in a full-blown pussy. 'I found it, Steve! 'He cried.'
When Levin returned home, he asked all the details about Kitty's illness and Shcherbatsky's plans, and although he would be ashamed to admit it, what he had learned was a pleasure to him.
It's also nice because there was hope, and it's even more pleasant because it hurt her, the one who hurt him so much.
But when Stepan Arkadić began to speak of the causes of Kitty's illness, and mentioned the name of Vronski, Levin interrupted him:
'I have no right to know the family details, to tell you the truth, and no interest.'
Stepan Arkadić smiled a little bit, picking up an instant and as familiar change in Levin's face as he had been as morbid as he had had fun a minute ago.
'Are you done with the woods with Ryabinin? 'I asked Levin.'
'Yes, I have.
It's a lovely price, thirty-eight thousand. Eight in advance, and the rest six years.
I've been dealing with this for a long time.
No one else gave it to me.
'It means that you gave away the forest for nothing,' said Levin sombrely.
'I mean, why free?' 'Stepan Arkadič said with a good smile, knowing that it would be bad for Levin now.
'Because the forest is worth at least 500 rubles per tithe,' answered Levin.
'Oh, these are my farm owners! 'Stepan Arkadić said funnyly.' 'This is your tone of contempt toward our urban brother!'
And how to do it, we'll always do it.
Believe me, I've read it all,' he said, 'and the woods have been sold very well, so I'm afraid as much as he will.
After all, it is not an insulted forest,' said Stepan Arkadych, seeking to convince Levin, with the word offensive, of the injustice of his doubt -- and more of it wood.
And it'll be no more than thirty tithes, and he gave me 200 rubles.
Levin smiled in contempt.
'I know,' he thought, 'this is not one of his manners, but of all the people of the city who, having been in the village every two years every ten years and having noticed two or three words from the village, use them by the way and in the wrong way, are firmly convinced that they all already know.
Annoyed, it's gonna be thirty fattenings.
He speaks words, and he doesn't understand anything."
'I will not teach you what you write in front of me,' he said, 'and if I have to, I will ask you. And you're so sure you understand all this forest literacy.
It's hard.
Have you seen trees?
'How to count trees?' 'Laughing,' said Stepan Arkadić, all wishing to get his friend out of his bad mood. 'The number of the sands, the rays of the planets, though the mind could be tall...'
'Yes, and the mind of the tall Ryabinin can.'
And no merchant will buy it unless it's given away like you.
I know your forest.
I've been hunting there every year, and your woods cost 500 rubles with clean money, and he's given you 200.
So you gave him 30 grand.
'Well, it's a lot of fun,' said Stepan Arkadić sorryly, 'why didn't anyone give it to me?'
'Cause he's got a glass of merchants; he gave him a retreatee.
I've dealt with all of them, I know them.
It's not the merchants, it's the maids.
He's not gonna go on a case where he's gonna get ten, fifteen percent, and he's waiting to buy a 20-pound ruble.
'A lot!
You're insane.
'Nothing,' said Levin sombrely when they came to the house.
At the porch there was already a tight, iron - and - skin - wrapped cart with a tight, wide, fat horse.
There was a tight-blooded and tight-cut orderman in the cart who served as Ryabinina's coach.
Ryabinin himself was already in the house and met his buddies at the front.
Ryabinin was a tall, skinny middle-aged man, with a mustache and a shaved, outstanding chin and convex eyes.
He was wearing a long-sex blue suit with buttons below his arse and high, shrivelled on the pins and straight on the caviars of his boots, over which he wore large calories.
He wiped his face with his handkerchief and, sniffing a tuxedo that was already holding up very well, smiled at them, reaching out his hand to Stepana Arkadyich, as if he wanted to catch something.
'Here you have come,' said Stepan Arkadić, giving him his hand. 'Great.
'Did not dare disobey the orders of your Lordship, even though the road was too bad.
He was on foot all the way, but he showed up on time.
Konstantin Dmitrich, my respects,' he turned to Levin, trying to catch his hand as well.
But Levin, frowning, pretended not to notice his hand, and took out the valdshneps. 'Was it fun to be hunted?'
What kind of birds are they going to be? 'I added Ryabinin, looking down on the valdshneps,' they tasted. 'And he shoved his head inconveniently, as if doubting that sheep should be worth the bait.'
'Would you like to go to the office?' 'Smokely frowning,' said Levin in French to Stepan Arkadič. 'Enter the office, you'll have a word there.'
'It is possible, anywhere,' said Ryabinin with contemptible dignity, as if to let others feel that there can be difficulties, as well as who they can handle, but there can never be any difficulties for him.
When Ryabinin entered the office, he looked at the habit of finding an image, but when he found it, he did not cross over.
He looked around the wardrobes and bookshelfs and with the same doubt as about the valdshneps, smiled in contempt and shoved his head unconscionably, no longer allowing this sheep to be worth making.
'Well, did you bring the money?' 'Oblonsky asked.' 'Sit down.
'We will not stand for money.
See you, I've come to talk to you.
'What shall I talk to you about?'
You guys sit down.
'It is possible,' said Ryabinin, sitting down in the most excruciating manner, leaning on the back of the chair. 'Cause you have to give up, Prince.
There will be a sin.
And the money is final, up to a penny.
There's no stopping for money.
Levin, who had put the gun in the closet, had already come out of the door, but when he heard the words of the merchant, he stopped.
'The forest was taken for nothing,' he said. 'He came to me late, or I would have given him a price.'
Ryabinin stood up and smiled silently and looked from the bottom up at Levin.
'Very niggardly, Konstantin Dmitrich,' he said with a smile, turning to Stepan Arkadyich, 'you can't buy anything.
I sold wheat, I gave you good money.
'Why would I give you my gift?'
I didn't find it on the ground, and I didn't steal it.
'Have mercy, it is not possible to steal positively at the present time.
It's all final in the present time of public trial, it's all noble today; it's not something to steal.
We spoke in honour.
They put a lot of money in the woods, you can't settle it.
Please give up a little bit.
'Are you out of business or not?
If it's over, there's nothing to bargain for, and if it's not over,' said Levin, 'I buy the woods.
The smile suddenly disappeared from Ryabinin's face. The hawk, the predatory, and the hard expression is on it.
He unwrapped his jacket with his quick bony fingers, opened his shirt for release, copper buttons of a vest and a chain of watches, and quickly pulled out a fat old wallet.
'Perhaps my forest,' he said, quickly crossing and reaching out his hand. 'Take the money, my forest.
This is how Ryabinin sells, not counts,' he spoke, frowning and waving his wallet.
'I wouldn't be in a hurry if I were you,' said Levin.
'Give me mercy,' said Oblonsky with surprise, 'for I have given my word.
Levin left the room, slamming the door.
Ryabinin, looking at the door, shaked his head with a smile.
'All youth, final childhood is the same.'
'Cause I'm buying, believe in honor, so for the glory of one, this is Ryabinin, not who bought the other from the Oblon grove.
God's gonna let us find the calculations.
Trust God.
Please. It's my duty to write...
An hour later, the merchant, sniffing his robe neatly and zipping his hooks, sat in his tight, shackled cart with a condition in his pocket and drove home.
'Oh, these gentlemen! 'He said to the orderman,' said one subject.
'It is as it is,' answered the orderman, handing him the lead and the leather apron. 'And with the purchase, Michael Ignatich?'
'Well, well...
Stepan Arkadych, with the pocket of the series that the merchant had given him three months in advance, went upstairs.
The forest was over, the money was in his pocket, the drive was beautiful, and Stepan Arkadić was in the most fun mood, and therefore he was particularly eager to dispel the bad mood that had struck Levin.
He wanted to finish his day at dinner as pleasant as he had begun.
Indeed, Levin was in a bad mood and, despite all his desire to be gentle and kind with his dear guest, he could not overcome himself.
Hmmel told me Kitty wasn't married, started taking it apart a little bit.
Kitty is single and sick, sick from love for the man who neglected her.
It's like an insult that fell on him.
While she ignored her, she ignored them, Levin.
Consequently, he had the right to despise Levin and therefore was his enemy.
But Levin didn't think of all this.
He felt vaguely that there was something offensive about it, and now he was angry not at what upset him, but at everything that seemed to him.
The silly sale of the forest, the deception that Oblonsky was caught in and committed in his house, annoyed him.
'Are you done?' 'He said, meeting Stepan Arkadyić upstairs. 'Would you like to have dinner?'
'Yes, I will.
What an appetite I have in my village, a miracle!
Why didn't you offer to eat Ryabinina?
'Oh, damn it!
'But how you treat him! 'Oblonsky said.' 'You didn't give him your hand either.
Why don't you give him your hands?
'Cause I'm not gonna give up my hands, I'm gonna give my hands a hundred times better.
'What a retrograde you are, though!
What about the confluence? 'Oblonsky said.'
'Who likes to blend in, but I hate it.'
'You, I see, are strongly retrograding.
'Really, I never thought who I was.
I'm Konstantin Levin, nothing else.
'And Konstantin Levin, who was very insane, said with a smile," Stepan Arkadić said.
'Yes, I'm in a bad mood, and you know why?
Oh, excuse me, your stupid sale...
Stepan Arkadić groaned well, as a man who is innocently offended and displeased.
'A lot! 'He said.' 'When there was a time when someone would sell something and they wouldn't say to him right now after the sale, 'It's worth a lot more?'
As long as they're sold, no one's giving...
No, I see you have a tooth against this poor Ryabinin.
'Maybe there is.
Do you know why?
You're gonna say again that I'm retrograding, or what a terrible word, but I'm still sorry and sorry to see it on all sides, the ongoing poverty of the noblery I belong to, and despite the confluence, I'm very glad that I am.
And poverty, not because of luxury -- it would be nothing; living in bark -- it's a noble matter; it's only nobles who know how to live.
Now the men around us are buying land,' I am not offended.
Barin's doing nothing, man's working, and he's crowding out a idle man.
That's how it's supposed to be. And I'm very happy with the man.
But I'm sorry to see this poverty by some sort of, I don't know, innocentness.
There's a Polak tenant who bought half the price from a barn who lives in Nice, a lovely estate.
They're renting a merchant for a tithe of land that costs ten rubles.
There's no reason you've given it thirty grand.
'So what?' count every tree?
'It's not necessary to count.
You didn't count, but Ryabinin did.
The children of Ryabinin will have the means to life and education, and yours will probably not!
'Well, I'm sorry, but there's something tiny about that.
We've got our classes, they've got theirs, and they need some air.
Well, it's done, and it's over.
Here comes the frosting, my favorite eggs.
And Agatha Mikhaylovna will give us this herbal woman a wonderful...
Stepan Arkadić sat down at the table and started making jokes with Agatha Mikhaylovna, telling her that he hadn't eaten dinner like this in a long time.
'At least you commend,' said Agatha Mikhaylovna, 'and Konstantin Dmitrich, whatever you give him, even if the bread is crusty,' he ate and went.
No matter how hard Levin tried to overcome himself, he was dark and silent.
He had to do one question to Stepan Arkadyich, but he couldn't solve it, and he didn't find the form, the time, the way and the time to make it.
Stepan Arkadić had already gone downstairs, undressed, washed again, put on a frigid nightshirt, and lied down, and Levin was slow in his room, talking about all kinds of trifling things, and unable to ask what he wanted.
'As the soap is amazingly done,' he said, looking back and deploying a fragrant piece of soap that Agatha Mikhaylovna had prepared for the guest, but that Oblonsky had not used. 'Look, it's a work of art.
'Yes, everything has now been improved,' said Stepan Arkadych, moist and blissful in the heat. 'Theaters, for example, and these amusing... Ahh!--he's been calling. 'Electrical light everywhere... ah!
'Yes, electric light,' said Levin. 'Yes.
Well, where's Vronsky now? 'He asked, when he had put the soap.'
'Vronsky?' 'Stepan Arkadič said, stopping the caller,' he was in Petersburg.
He left shortly after you and was never in Moscow.
And you know, Kostya, I will tell you the truth,' he continued, reclining on the table and putting on his hand his beautiful brown face, which glowed like stars, oily, kind, and sleepy eyes. 'It was your own fault.
You were scared of your opponent.
And as I told you at the time, I don't know whose side there was a better chance.
Why didn't you go through?
I told you the other day that... 'He razored with the same jaws without opening his mouth.
"Does he know or doesn't know I proposed? 'I thought Levin, looking at him.' 'Yeah, there's something tricky, diplomatic about him,' and feeling red, he looked silently into the eyes of Stepan Arkadjić.
'If there was anything on her part at the time, it was a passion for appearance,' continued Oblonsky. 'This, you know, perfect aristocraticism and the future situation in light did not affect her, but rather her mother.
Levin frowned.
An insult to the refusal he went through, as if fresh as the wound he had just sustained, set him on fire in the heart.
He was at home, and the walls help.
'Wait, wait,' he said, interrupting Oblonsky, 'you say, "Aristocratic.
And let me ask you, what is this aristocratic nature of Vronski or anyone else -- such aristocraticism that I may be neglected?
You think you're a Vronian Aristocrat, but I'm not.
The man whose father came out of nothing by sneaking around, whose mother God knows who he wasn't with...
No, I'm sorry, but I consider myself and people like me to be the aristocrat who in the past can point to three or four honest generations of highly educated families (gifts and minds are another matter) and who have never stood up to anyone, never needed anyone like my father, my grandfather.
And I know a lot of them.
It seems low to you that I count trees in the woods, and you give 30,000 to Ryabinina; but you get a rent and I don't know what else, and I don't get it, and that's why I treasure birth and labor...
We are aristocrats, not those who can only exist as handouts from the powerful of this world and who can be bought for double-granded.
'Who are you on?
I agree with you,' said Stepan Arkadić with sincerity and fun, although I felt that Levin, under the name of those who could be bought for a double-granded man, understood him as well.
He really liked Levin's rebirth. 'Who are you on?
Although a lot of things aren't true that you're talking about Vronski, I'm not talking about that.
I'm telling you straight, if I were you, I'd come with me to Moscow and...
'No, I don't know if you know or not, but I don't care. And I will tell you, 'I proposed and got rejected, and Katherina Alexandrovna is now a painful and shameful memory for me.
That's bullshit!
'But let's not talk.
Forgive me, please, if I was rude to you,' said Levin.
Now that he's said everything, he's back to the way he was in the morning. 'Aren't you mad at me, Steve?
Please don't be angry,' he said, and smiled and took his hand.
'No, not at all, not at all.
I'm glad we explained.
You know, morning drive can be good.
Shouldn't we go?
I wouldn't sleep, but I wouldn't sleep at the station.
'And beautiful.
Although his entire inner life was filled with his passion, his outside life was constantly and unbridled by the old, usual tracks of secular and regimental ties and interests.
The Poles' interests occupied an important place in the life of Vronski, both because he loved the regiment and even more because he was loved in the regiment.
Not only were he loved in the regiment, but he was respected and proud of him, proud of the fact that this man, rich, with excellent education and abilities, with open paths to all kinds of success and ambition and vanity, neglected all these things and took the interests of the regiment and of all the vital interests closest to the heart.
He was aware of this view of himself and, in addition to loving this life, felt obliged to maintain his view.
It goes without saying that he did not speak to any of his comrades about his love, nor did he speak in the strongest booze (otherwise, he had never been so drunk as to lose control of himself) and shut his mouth to those of his rash comrades who tried to insinuate him with his connection.
But, despite the fact that his love was known to the whole city -- increasingly or less rightly aware of his attitude towards Karenina -- most young people envied him precisely what was most difficult in his love -- in Karen &apos; s high position and, therefore, in the exposure of that connection to light.
The majority of young women who envied Anna, who had long been bored of what she was called justice, rejoiced at what they had anticipated and waited only to confirm the circulation of public opinion in order to bring down on her the weight of their contempt.
They've been making the mud balls they're gonna throw at her when the time comes.
Most of the elderly and high-ranking people were displeased with this public scandal.
Her mother, after learning about his connection, was pleased at first -- and because nothing, in her mind, gave the last trim to a brilliant young man as a connection in the highest light, and because Karenina, who liked her so much about her son, was still the same as all beautiful and decent women, by the countess of Vronski.
But lately, she found out that her son had abandoned the position offered to him, which was important to his career, only to stay in the regiment where he could see Karenina, she learned that they were not happy with the high rankings, and she changed her mind.
She didn't like what she found out about that connection, either, it wasn't the brilliant, graceful social bond she would approve of, but some sort of verterian, desperate passion, as she was told, that might involve him in foolishness.
She hasn't seen him since his sudden departure from Moscow and demanded, through her eldest son, that he come to her.
The older brother was also displeased with less.
He did not know what kind of love it was, whether it was big or small, passionate or not, vicious or not, (he himself, having children, kept a dancer and was therefore condescending); but he knew that it was love that was not liked by those who needed to be liked and therefore did not approve of his brother's behavior.
In addition to the classes of service and light, Wronski had another occupation -- a horse before which he was a passionate hunter.
This year, officers were assigned to race with obstacles. He signed up for the races, bought an English blood mare, and despite his love, he was passionate, albeit modest, interested in the upcoming races...
Two passions didn't bother one friend.
On the contrary, he needed an activity and a passion independent of his love, in which he freshened up and rested from too much of his experience.
On the day of the Red Riders, Vronsky first came to eat beefsteaks in the common hall of the regiment's artifacts.
He didn't have to be very hard on himself, for his weight was exactly the equivalent of four puddings with half; but he shouldn't have fattened up, so he avoided the floury and the sweet.
He sat in an undressed white jacket, reclining on the table with both hands, and, waiting for the book of the French novel on the plate, he looked at the book of the French novel.
He only looked in the book so he wouldn't talk to the incoming and outgoing officers, and he thought.
He thought about Anna's promise to give him a date this afternoon after the races.
But he didn't see her for three days, and because of her husband's return from abroad, he didn't know if it was possible or not, and he didn't know how to find out.
He saw her the last time he saw her at Cousin Betsy's.
He drove as little as possible to the Karennas. Now he wanted to go there and think about how to do it.
"I'll tell him Betsy sent me to ask if she's coming to the races.
Of course I will," he decided with himself, raising his head from the book. And when he saw the joy of seeing her, he brightened his face.
'Come to my house to be filled with a three-wheeled stroller,' he said to the servant who gave him the beeft on a silver hot dish, and when he brought the dish, he began to eat.
There were balls, talk, and laughter in the nearby pool hall.
Two officers came from the front door: one young, with a weak, thin face, who had recently entered their regiment from the Paže Corps; and another puffy, old officer with an arm bracelet and swimming little eyes.
He looked at them, frowned, and began to eat and read together, as if he had not noticed them, touching the book.
'What? You're gonna back up your job? 'The fat officer said, sitting beside him.'
'You see,' he replied, frowning, screaming and not looking at him.
'Aren't you afraid of getting fat? 'He said, turning a chair for a young officer.
'What? 'Angrily he said, making a make-up of disgust and showing his whole teeth.'
'Aren't you afraid of getting fat?
'Man, motherfucker! 'Wronski said, without answering, and by transferring the book to the other side, he continued to read.'
A drunk officer took a wine map and turned to a young officer. 'You choose what we drink,' he said, giving him a map and looking at him.
'I think it's Rainway,' said the young officer, shyly touching Wronsky and trying to catch a slightly grown mustache with his fingers.
A young officer stood up when he saw that Wronsky wasn't turning around.
'Let's go to the pool hall,' he said.
A swollen officer stood up, and they headed towards the door.
At that time, Yashwin's tall and stinted company entered the room and, upstairs, nodded the head of the two officers, came up to him.
'Ah! There he is! 'He screamed, striking him hard with his big hand on the chase.'
He looked agitated, but immediately his face brightened in a calm and firm lazy way.
'Smart, Alesha,' said the company with a loud baritone. 'Now eat and drink one drink.
'No, you don't want to eat.'
'Here are the inseparable ones,' added Yashwin, laughing at the two officers who were leaving the room at that time.
And he sat down by the side of Vronski, bent with sharp corners his very long chairs of stairwells and tibia in narrow reituses. 'Why didn't you stop by the red theater yesterday?'
Noumerova wasn't bad at all. Where have you been?
'I've been sitting at Tversky's,' he replied.
'Ah! 'Yashvin responded.
Yashwin, a player, and not only a man without rules, but a man with immoral rules,' Yashwin was in the regiment the best friend of Wronsky's.
He loved him and for his extraordinary physical strength, which he showed for the most part by being able to drink like a barrel, not to sleep, and still to be the same, and for the great moral strength he displayed in his dealings with his superiors and comrades, causing fear and respect, and in the game he played for tens of thousands and always, despite the drink of wine, so thinly and firmly that he was considered the first player in the English club.
He respected and loved him, especially because he felt that Yaszvin loved him not for his name and wealth, but for himself...
And of all the people with him, he'd like to talk about his love.
He felt that Yaszwin alone, despite the fact that he seemed to despise any feeling, &quot; one seemed to understand the strong passion that now filled his whole life.
Besides, he was convinced that Yashwin probably no longer finds pleasure in gossip and scandal, and he understands that feeling as he should, that is, knows and believes that this love is not a joke, not a joke, but something more serious and more important.
He did not speak to him about his love, but he knew that he knew everything, understood everything as he should, and he was pleased to see it in his eyes.
'Oh, yes! 'He said that he was at Tversky's, and with his black eyes shining, he took up the left moustache, and began to fill it in his mouth, according to his bad habit.'
'Well, what did you do yesterday?
You win? 'Wronsky asked.'
'Eighty thousand.
Three isn't good, I don't think he's gonna give it to me.
'Well, you can lose for me,' he said, laughing.
(Yashwyn had a big bet on Vronski.)
'I will never lose.' 'One Mahotin is dangerous.
And the conversation went to the expectations of the current race, which was the only one he could think of now.
'Come on, I'm done,' he said, and he went up to the door.
Yashwin stood up, too, stretching his huge legs and long back.
'It's too early for me to have lunch, and I have to have a drink. I'll be right there. Hey, wine! 'He cried out to his celebrity in command, thick and shivering the glass with a voice.' 'No, don't,' he cried again immediately. 'You're home, so I'll go with you.
And they went with Vronski.
He stood in a spacious and clean, heated over the Chukhonian besiege.
Petritzki lived with him in the camps.
Petritzki slept when Vronsky and Yashvin entered the house.
'Get up, sleep,' said Yaszwin, walking behind the partition and pushing behind his shoulder with a nose in the pillow of a cracked Petrisky.
Petritzka suddenly jumped on his knees and looked back.
'Your brother was here,' he said. 'He woke me up, damn it, said he'd come again. 'And again, he pulled a blanket on his pillow. 'Leave it, Yashwin,' he said, angry with Yashwin, who was carrying a blanket from him. 'Leave it! 'He turned and opened his eyes. 'You'd better tell me what to drink; it's so gross in your mouth that...'
'Vodka is the best,' Yashvin tried. 'Tereshchenko! "The vodka of the barn and the cucumber," he yelled, apparently listening to his voice.
'Vodka, do you think? Huh? 'I asked Petritzka, wrinkling and rubbing my eyes.' 'Are you going to drink?'
Together, let's drink!
Vronsky, will you have a drink? 'Peteritzkah said, standing up and wrapping himself under his arms in a tiger blanket.' He walked out the door of the partition, raised his hands and sang in French: "There was a king in Tu-u-le." 'Vronski, will you have a drink?'
'Get out,' said Wronsky, who was wearing a smurf served by a footman.
'Where's that going? 'Yashvin asked him.' 'Here comes the three,' he added when he saw the wheelchair coming.
'To the stables, and I also need to see Bryansky about the horses,' he said.
He really promised to be with Bryansky, ten versts from Petergof, and to bring him money for horses; and he wanted to be there in time.
But the comrades immediately realized that he was just going to the wrong place.
Petritzka, while still singing, winked with his eye and gutted his lips, as if we knew what the Bryansky was like.
'Don't be late! 'Yashvin only said, and to change the conversation, 'What good is my old-fashioned?' 'He asked, looking out the window, about the native he sold.'
'Wait! 'Peteritzki cried out to the one who had already left Wronski.' 'Your brother left you a letter and a note, wait, where are they?
Vronsky's stopped.
'Well, where are they?
'Where are they?
That's the question! 'I have spoken with a solemn Petritzki, pointing up from his nose with an index finger.'
'Tell me, it's stupid! 'Smileing,' said Vronsky.
'I didn't drown Kamina.
Here somewhere.
'Well, that's a lot of lies!
Where's the letter?
'No, I forgot.
Or did I dream?
Wait, wait!
Don't be mad at me!
If, like me, you had four bottles on your brother yesterday, you'd forget where you were.
Wait, I'll remember!
Petritzki went behind the partition and lay on his bed.
'Wait!
That's how I lay down, that's how he stood.
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah...
That's it! 'And Petritzka took the letter out of the mattress where he hid it.
He took a letter and a note from his brother.
That was what he was expecting -- a letter from his mother blaming him for not coming, and a note from his brother saying he needed to talk.
Wronsky knew it was all about the same thing.
"What's their business?" 'Cause he thought, and when he washed the letters, he shoved them between the buttons of the suture to read them carefully.
Two officers, one of them and the other of the regiment, met him in the blues.
Wronsky's apartment has always been the home of all officers.
'Where to?
'We have to go to Petergof.
'And the horse came from the king?'
'I've come, I haven't seen it yet.
'They say Mahotina Gladiator's dead.
'This is nonsense!
How are you gonna get through this mess? 'The other said.'
'Here are my saviors! 'Screaming, when he saw them entering, Petritzkay, who was standing before him with a vodka and a pickle of salt on the tray.' 'Here's Yashwin telling me to drink to freshen up.
'Well, you asked us yesterday,' said one of those who came, 'they kept us awake all night.
'No, how did we end up! 'Cause Petritzka said, 'Wolf climbed the roof and said he was sad.
I say, give me the music, the funeral march!
He fell asleep on the roof under the funeral march.
'Drink, drink vodka for sure, and then celery water and a lot of lemon,' said Yashwin, standing over Petritzki, as a mother forcing a child to take a cure -- and then a little champagne -- so a bottle.
'That's clever.
Let's have a drink.
'No, goodbye, gentlemen, I do not drink today.
'Are you gonna make it harder?'
Well, we're alone.
Give me celery water and lemon.
'Vronsky! 'Someone screamed when he was going out in the hay.'
'What?
'You'd cut your hair, 'or you'd have heavy hair, especially bald hair.'
It's really premature to start babbling.
He laughed, showing his teeth, and put his head on the bald, and went out and sat in the wheelchair.
'To the stables! 'He said, and he took out the letters to read them, but then he thought, so as not to have fun until the horse was examined.' -- "Next time!"
Temporal stables, blackboards, were built by the hippodrome itself, and his horse was to be brought there yesterday.
He hasn't seen her yet.
In these last few days, he didn't drive on his own, but he assigned a coach, and now he was determined not to know what condition his horse was in.
As soon as he came out of the wheelchair as the stables of his (grum), the so-called boy, after learning from afar his wheelchair, called the coach.
A dry Englishman in tall boots and a short jacket, with a piece of hair left only under his chin, a poor jockey walk, splintering his elbows and swinging, came out facing.
'What about Fru-Fru? 'Then he asked in English.'
'All right, sir -- all is right, sir,' said an English voice somewhere inside his throat. 'You better not go,' he added by raising his hat. 'I put on a muzzle, and the horse is agitated.
It's better not to go, it's bothering the horse.
'No, I'll come in.
I'd like to see it.
'Come on,' said the Englishman, yet without opening his mouth, frowning, and waving his elbows, went forward with his loose walk.
They entered the yard in front of the barracks.
A duty officer, wearing a clean jacket, a dressed, handsome boy, with a broom in his hand, met those who entered and followed them.
In the barracks, there were five horses in the afternoons, and Wronsky knew that he was about to be brought in and stood by his main rival, the red-haired five-step Gladiator of Mahotin.
Even more than his horse, he wanted to see Gladiator, whom he had not seen; but he knew that under the law of horse hunting, not only could he not be seen, but he was indecently asked about him.
While he was walking down the hallway, the boy opened the door to the second day on the left, and he saw a reddish big horse and white legs.
He knew it was the Gladiator, but with the feeling of a man turning his back on someone else's open letter, he turned away and approached Fru-Fr.
'The horse is here, Ma-K...'
Mac... I can never say that name,' said the Englishman over his shoulder, pointing a big, dirty finger at Gladiator's diary.
'Mahotina?'
Yeah, that's one of my serious rivals,' said Wronsky.
'If you were driving it,' said the Englishman, 'I would hold for you.
'Fru-Fru is more nervous, he is stronger,' said Vronsky, smiling at the praise of his ride.
'It's all about driving and pluck with obstacles,' said the Englishman.
Pluck, i.e., energy and courage, not only did Wronsky feel enough about himself, but, more importantly, he was firmly convinced that no one in the world could have this cloak more than he did.
'Do you know that there was no need for more sweat?'
'No need,' answered the Englishman. 'Please don't speak loudly.
The horse is anxious,' he added, nodding his head on a locked daylight, before which they stood, and where he heard his legs turned on the straw.
He opened the door, and Wronsky entered a poorly lit window of one small window in the afternoon.
There was a karaco horse with a muzzle.
Looking around in the middle of the day, he again gave one common look to his beloved horse.
Fru-Fru was the average height of a horse, and by the statues it wasn't impeccable.
She was a narrow bone; although her breast was very forward, her breast was narrow.
The butt was a little whistled, and the legs of the front, and especially the back, had a significant cosop.
The muscles of the hind and front legs were not particularly large; however, the horse was unusually wide in the subside, which was particularly striking now, with its soak and roasted abdomen.
The bones of her legs below her knees didn't seem thicker than her finger, looking forward, but they were incredibly wide, looking at the side.
It's all, except for the ribs, like it was squeezed off the sides and pulled deep into it.
But she had a high quality that made her forget all the flaws; that quality was blood, the blood that affects, in English expression.
Sharply protruding muscles from under the net lived in thin, moving and smooth as atlas, skin, seemed as strong as bone.
Her dry head, with convulsive shiny, hilarious eyes, expanded at the snoring into outstanding nostrils, with blood poured inside her.
In the whole figure, and especially in her head, there was a certain energy and tender expression together.
She was one of those animals that didn't seem to talk just because the mechanical device of their mouths wouldn't allow them to do that.
At least it seemed like she understood everything he felt now when he looked at her.
As soon as he entered her, she took the air deep into her body, and with her convulsed eye, the squirrel was filled with blood, staring at the other side of the door, shaking the mortuary and tingling from the foot to the leg.
'Well, you see how excited she is,' said the Englishman.
'Oh, honey! Oh!-- said the Vronskis, walking up to the horse and talking her into it.
But the closer he came, the more worried she was.
It was only when he came to her head that she suddenly became quiet, and her muscles shook under thin, tender wool.
He ironed her strong neck, fixed her sharp grooved on the other side a string of grooves, and turned his face towards her stretched, thin as the wing of a bat, and nostrils.
She pulled the air out of the tense nostrils, shuddering, pinched the sharp ear, and pulled out a strong black lip to Bronski, as if to catch him by the sleeve.
But when she remembered the muzzle, she shook them up and moved one after the other her fine legs.
'Calm down, sweetheart, calm down! 'He said, touching her with his hand on the butt, and with the joy of knowing that the horse was in the best condition, he came out of the day.'
The horse's excitement also came to mind; he felt that blood was pouring into his heart, and that, like horses, he wanted to move, to bite; it was also terrible and fun.
'Well, I hope so,' he said to the Englishman, 'at six and a half in place.
'It's all right,' said the Englishman. 'Where are you going, my lord? 'He asked, suddenly using the name my-Logd, which he almost never used.
He was surprised to raise his head and to see how he could look, not in the eyes, but at the forehead of an Englishman, wondering at the courage of his question.
But when he realized that the Englishman did not look at him as his master, but as a jockey, he said to him:
'I have to go to Bryansky. I'll be home in an hour.
"This is the time I've been asked this question!" 'He said to himself, and he blushed, which he rarely had.
The Englishman looked closely at him. And as if he knew where he was going, he added:
'The first thing is to be calm before driving,' he said, 'don't be in a mood or upset.
'All right,' he smiled, replied, and jumped into the wheelchair and told him to go to Peterhof.
As soon as he drove a few steps away, like a cloud that threatened the rain in the morning, she swerved, and the rain was pouring.
"Bad! 'Cause he thought, lifting up the wheelchair. 'And it was filthy, and now it's gonna be a swamp.'
Sitting in the privacy of a private wheelchair, he obtained his mother's letter and his brother's note and read them.
Yeah, it was all the same.
Everyone, his mother, his brother, found it necessary to interfere in his heart.
This intervention provoked anger in him -- a feeling he rarely felt.
"What do they care?
Why does everyone feel obliged to take care of me?
And why are they bothering me?
Because they see that it's something they can't understand.
If it was just a foul social bond, they'd leave me alone.
They feel that it's something else, that it's not a toy, that woman is worth my life.
And that doesn't make sense, and that's why they're upset.
Whatever fate is and will not be ours, we have made it, and we do not complain about it,' he said, in a word we connect ourselves to Anna. 'No, they need to teach us how to live.
They have no idea what happiness is, they don't know that without that love for us, neither happiness nor misery -- no life," he thought.
He was angry at everyone for interfering just because he felt in the shower that they, these all, were right.
He felt that the love that linked him to Anna had not been a momentary passion that would pass through the way the social bond goes, leaving no trace of either in his life, except for pleasant or unpleasant memories.
He felt all the anguish of his situation, all the difficulty in showing up to the eyes of all the world in which they were, hiding their love, lying and lying; and lying, cheating, scheming, and constantly thinking about others when the passion that bound them was so strong that they both forgot about everything other than their love.
He reminiscently remembered all the often repeated cases of the need for lies and deception that were so offensive to his nature; he remembered in particular the sense of shame she had experienced on several occasions for this need for deception and lies.
And he had a strange feeling that, since his association with Anna, he sometimes found himself on him.
It was an awful feeling about something: Alexei or Alexandrovich or himself or the whole world -- he didn't know very well.
But he's always driven away that weird feeling.
And now that I'm shaking, I've kept on thinking.
"Yeah, she used to be unhappy, but proud and calm, and now she can't be calm and worthy, even though she doesn't show it.
Yes, it must come to an end,' he decided with himself.
And for the first time, he had a clear idea that it was necessary to stop this lie, and the sooner the better.
"To throw everything to her and to me and to hide somewhere alone with his love," he said to himself.
The lion was short, and when he drove all over the rats of the natives, pulling them out of the mud with no lead, the sun looked out again, and the roofs of the dach, the old lypes of gardens on both sides of the main street glittered with wet glitter, and the branches had fun drips, and water ran from the roofs.
He had no idea how the rain would spoil the hippodrome, but was now glad that the rain would probably catch her at home and alone, since he knew that Aleksey Alexandrovich, who had recently returned from the waters, had not moved from Petersburg.
In the hope of finding her alone, he always did, as he did, to pay less attention to himself, tears, without moving the bridge, and walked.
He didn't walk on the porch from the street, but he walked into the yard.
'Did Barin come?' 'He asked the gardener.'
'No, I'm not.
The lady's home.
The gardener answered: "You are resting from the porch; there are people in it, and they will burn," said the gardener.
'No, I will come from the garden.
And after making sure that she was alone, and wanting to catch her by surprise, because he hadn't promised to be today, and she certainly didn't think that he would come before the races, he went, supporting the sword and carefully walking along the sand of the flowered path to the terrace that went out into the garden.
He now forgot what he thought dearly about the gravity and difficulty of his situation.
He thought about one thing, that he'd see her now in more than one imagination, but alive, all that she really is.
He had already entered all the way in his leg, not to make any noise, according to the steps of the terrace, when he suddenly remembered what he had always forgotten and what was the most painful aspect of his relationship to her -- her son with his questioner, who he thought was disgusting.
The boy was most likely an obstacle to their relationship.
When he was here, not only did he not allow himself to talk about something they couldn't repeat in front of everyone, but they wouldn't even let themselves insinuate what the boy wouldn't understand.
They did not collude about it, but it was settled by itself.
They would consider it an insult to themselves to deceive this child.
They used to talk to each other like they knew each other.
However, despite this caution, he often saw the child's thoughtful and inconvenient look at him and the strange shyness, roughness, tenderness, coldness, and shyness toward him.
It's like a child felt that there was an important relationship between this man and his mother that he can't understand.
Indeed, the boy felt that he could not understand the relationship, and he was able and could not understand the feeling that he should have for that man.
With a child &apos; s sensitivity to feeling, he clearly saw that the father, the governess, the nanny -- not only did they not like him, but they looked at him with disgust and fear, even though they did not say anything about him, but that his mother looked at him as his best friend.
"What does that mean?
Who is he?
How should you love him?
If I don't understand, it's my fault, or I'm stupid or a bad boy,' thought the child; and it was his testative, questionable, somewhat uncooperative expression, and the shyness, and the roughness, which so embarrassed him.
The presence of this child has always been a source of the strange sense of odor that he has experienced lately.
The child &apos; s presence in Wronsk and Anna gave rise to a feeling similar to that of a sailor who saw a compass, that the direction he was moving quickly was far apart from the right direction, but that it was not in his power to stop the movement, that every minute he removed him from the right direction, and that to admit to retreat was like confessing to his death.
The child with his naive view of life was a compass that showed them the extent of their deviation from what they knew but didn't want to know.
This time, Serezha was not home, she was completely alone and sat on the terrace, waiting for the return of her son, who had left to walk and was caught in the rain.
She sent a man and a girl to look for him and sat waiting.
Dressed in white with a broad sewing dress, she sat in the corner of the terrace behind the flowers and did not hear it.
By leaning down her blackheaded head, she pressed her forehead against a cold leukee standing on the railings and both her beautiful hands, with rings so familiar to him, held on to the leuka.
The beauty of all her shapes, her heads, her neck, her hands, every time, as a surprise, was astounded by Wronsky.
He stopped looking at her with admiration.
But just now he wanted to step up to get close to her, she already felt him coming, pushed her leukka away, and turned her hot face towards him.
'What is the matter with you?
Are you ill? 'He said in French, approaching her.
He wanted to run to her; but when he remembered that he could have been a stranger, he looked back at the balcony door and blushed as he had blushed every time, feeling that he had to be afraid and look back.
'No, I am healthy,' she said, raising her hand and shaking it firmly. 'I wasn't expecting... you.
'Oh, my God! How cold your hands are! 'He said.'
'You scared me,' she said. 'I am alone, and I wait for Serezha; he went for a walk; they will come from here.'
But even though she was trying to be calm, her lips were shaking.
'Excuse me for coming, but I couldn't spend a day without seeing you,' he continued in French, as he always said, avoiding the impossible-cold between them you and dangerous you in Russian.
'Forgive me for what?'